src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON TA_FUT

+1Sg+3SgO:%>aki		   # ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>akwâwi	   # ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>âyâhki	   # ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>âyâhkwâwi  # ;
+12Pl+3SgO:%>âyâhko	   # ;
+12Pl+3PlO:%>âyâhkwâwi # ;

+2Sg+3SgO:%>aci		   # ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>atwâwi	   # ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>âyêko	   # ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>âyêkwâwi   # ;
					   
+3Sg+4SgO:%>âyici	   # ;
+3Sg+3SgO:%>âci		   # ;
+3Sg+3PlO:%>ikotwâwi   # ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>iski	   # ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>ikoyêko	   # ;
+3Sg+1SgO:%>ici		   # ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>ikoyâhki   # ;
+3Sg+12PlO:%>ikoyahko  # ;
					   
+3Pl+3SgO:%>âtwâwi	   # ;
+3Pl+3PlO:%>âtwâwi	   # ;
!+3Pl+3PlO:%>ikotwâwi   # ; ??
					   
+4Sg+4PlO:%>ikoyici  # ;
+4Sg+3SgO:%>ikoci	   # ;
+4Sg+3PlO:%>âyici	   # ;
+4Pl+4PlO:%>ikoyici  # ;
+4Pl+3SgO:%>ikoci	   # ;
+4Pl+3PlO:%>âyici	   # ;



LEXICON TAVw_FUT

+1Sg+3SgO:%>aki		   # ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>akwâwi	   # ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>âyâhki	   # ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>âyâhkwâwi  # ;
+12Pl+3SgO:%>âkoyahko	   # ;
+12Pl+3PlO:%>âkoyahkwâwi # ;

+2Sg+3SgO:%>aci		   # ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>atwâwi	   # ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>âyêko	   # ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>âyêkwâwi   # ;
					   
+3Sg+4SgO:%>âyici	   # ;
+3Sg+3SgO:%>âci		   # ;
+3Sg+3PlO:%>%^WIikotwâwi   # ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>%^WIiski	   # ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>%^WIikoyêko	   # ;
+3Sg+1SgO:%>%^WIici		   # ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>%^WIikoyâhki   # ;
+3Sg+12PlO:%>%^WIikoyahko  # ;
					   
+3Pl+3SgO:%>âtwâwi	   # ;
+3Pl+3PlO:%>âtwâwi	   # ;
!+3Pl+3PlO:%>ikotwâwi   # ; ??
					   
+4Sg+4PlO:%>%^WIikoyici  # ;
+4Sg+3SgO:%>%^WIikoci	   # ;
+4Sg+3PlO:%>âyici	   # ;
+4Pl+4PlO:%>%^WIikoyici  # ;
+4Pl+3SgO:%>%^WIikoci	   # ;
+4Pl+3PlO:%>âyici	   # ;

LEXICON TACw_FUT

+1Sg+3SgO:%>aki		   # ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>akwâwi	   # ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>âyâhki	   # ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>âyâhkwâwi  # ;
+12Pl+3SgO:%>âyâhki	   # ;
+12Pl+3PlO:%>âyâhkwâwi # ;

+2Sg+3SgO:%>aci		   # ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>atwâwi	   # ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>âyêko	   # ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>âyahkwâwi   # ;
					   
+3Sg+4SgO:%>âci	   # ;
+3Sg+3SgO:%>âci		   # ;
+3Sg+3PlO:%>%^IOikotwâwi   # ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>%^IOiski	   # ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>%^IOikoyêko	   # ;
+3Sg+1SgO:%>%^IOici		   # ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>%^IOikoyâhki   # ;
+3Sg+12PlO:%>%^IOikoyahko  # ;
					   
+3Pl+3SgO:%>âtwâwi	   # ;
+3Pl+3PlO:%>âtwâwi	   # ;
!+3Pl+3PlO:%>ikotwâwi   # ; ??
					   
+4Sg+4PlO:%>%^IOikoyici  # ;
+4Sg+3SgO:%>%^IOikoci	   # ;
+4Sg+3PlO:%>%^IOitwâwi	   # ;
+4Sg+5PlO:%>%^IOikoyici	   # ;
+4Pl+4PlO:%>%^IOikoyici  # ;
+4Pl+3SgO:%>%^IOikoci	   # ;
+4Pl+3PlO:%>%^IOitwâwi	   # ;

LEXICON TA_IMP
@U.perspref.NULL@  2Sg_Imp ;
@U.perspref.NULL@  2Pl_Imp ;
@U.perspref.NULL@ 12Pl_Imp ;

!@U.verb.imp2sg@  2Sg_Imp ;
!@U.verb.imp1pl@  2Pl_Imp ;
!@U.verb.imp2pl@ 12Pl_Imp ;

LEXICON TATS_IMP
@U.perspref.NULL@  2SgTS_Imp ;
@U.perspref.NULL@  2PlTS_Imp ;
@U.perspref.NULL@ 12PlTS_Imp ;

!@U.verb.imp2sg@  2SgTS_Imp ;
!@U.verb.imp1pl@  2PlTS_Imp ;
!@U.verb.imp2pl@ 12PlTS_Imp ;

LEXICON TAVw_IMP
@U.perspref.NULL@  2SgVw_Imp ;
@U.perspref.NULL@  2PlVw_Imp ;
@U.perspref.NULL@   12Pl_Imp ;

!@U.verb.imp2sg@  2SgVw_Imp ;
!@U.verb.imp1pl@  2PlVw_Imp ;
!@U.verb.imp2pl@   12Pl_Imp ;

LEXICON TACw_IMP
@U.perspref.NULL@  2SgCw_Imp ;
@U.perspref.NULL@  2PlCw_Imp ;
@U.perspref.NULL@ 12PlCw_Imp ;

!@U.verb.imp2sg@  2SgCw_Imp ;
!@U.verb.imp1pl@  2PlCw_Imp ;
!@U.verb.imp2pl@ 12PlCw_Imp ;


LEXICON 2Sg_Imp
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>in # ;
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>inân # ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: # ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>ik # ;
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>âhkan # ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>âhkanik # ;
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>îhkan # ;
+Del+2Sg+2PlO:%>îhkâhk # ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>îhkâhk # ;

LEXICON 2Pl_Imp
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>ik # ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>ihk # ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>ihkok # ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>âhkêk # ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>âhkêkok # ;
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>îhkêk # ;

LEXICON 12Pl_Imp
+Imm+12Pl+3SgO:%>âtân # ;
+Imm+12Pl+3PlO:%>âtânik # ;
+Del+12Pl+3SgO:%>âhkahk # ;
+Del+12Pl+3PlO:%>âhkahkok # ;

LEXICON 2SgTS_Imp
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>%^TSin # ;
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>%^TSinân # ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:%>%^TS # ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>%^TSik # ;
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>%^TSâhkan # ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>%^TSâhkanik # ;
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>%^TSîhkan # ;
+Del+2Sg+2PlO:%>%^TSîhkâhk # ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>%^TSîhkâhk # ;

LEXICON 2PlTS_Imp
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>%^TSik # ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>ihk # ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>ihkok # ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>âhkêk # ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>âhkêkok # ;
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>%^TSîhkêk # ;

LEXICON 12PlTS_Imp
+Imm+12Pl+3SgO:%>âtân # ;
+Imm+12Pl+3PlO:%>âtânik # ;
+Del+12Pl+3SgO:%>âhkahk # ;
+Del+12Pl+3PlO:%>âhkahkok # ;

LEXICON 2SgVw_Imp
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>in # ;
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>inân # ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: # ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>ik # ;
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>âhkan # ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>âhkanik # ;
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>îhkan # ;
+Del+2Sg+2PlO:%>îhkâhk # ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>îhkâhk # ;

LEXICON 2PlVw_Imp
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>%^ik # ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>%^WIihk # ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>%^WIihkok # ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>âhkêk # ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>âhkêkok # ;
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>îhkêk # ;

!! LEXICON 12PlVw_Imp
!! +Imm+12Pl+3SgO:%>âtân # ;
!! +Imm+12Pl+3PlO:%>âtânik # ;
!! +Del+12Pl+3SgO:%>âhkahk # ;
!! +Del+12Pl+3PlO:%>âhkahkok # ;

LEXICON 2SgCw_Imp
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>%^IOin # ;
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>%^IOinân # ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: # ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>%^IOik # ;
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>âhkan # ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>âhkanik # ;
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>%^IOihkan # ;
+Del+2Sg+2PlO:%>%^IOihkâhk # ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>%^IOihkâhk # ;

LEXICON 2PlCw_Imp
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>%^IOik # ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>%^IOihk # ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>%^IOihkok # ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>âhkêk # ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>âhkêkok # ;
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>%^IOihkêk # ;

LEXICON 12PlCw_Imp
+Imm+12Pl+3SgO:%>âtân # ;
+Imm+12Pl+3PlO:%>âtânik # ;
+Del+12Pl+3SgO:%>âhkahk # ;
+Del+12Pl+3PlO:%>âhkahkok # ;


!! !! Transitive Inanimate (TI)
!     =========================
!     =========================

LEXICON TICONJ  !!= * @CODE@ adds baseform and directs to TICONJ-CONT
!< "+V":0 "+TI":0   "@U.perspref.NULL@" "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@"   >     # ; !Baseform
+V+TI: TICONJ-CONT ;

LEXICON TICONJi  !!= * @CODE@ adds baseform and directs to TICONJi-CONT
!< "+V":0 "+TI":0   "@U.perspref.NULL@" "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@"   >     # ; !Baseform
+V+TI: TICONJi-CONT ; 

LEXICON TICONJâ  !!= * @CODE@ adds baseform and directs to TICONJâ-CONT
!< "+V":0 "+TI":0   "@U.perspref.NULL@" "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@"   >     # ; !Baseform
+V+TI: TICONJi-CONT ; 



LEXICON TICONJ-CONT !!= * @CODE@
< "+Ind":0  "@U.mood.indep@" >  TI_IND ; !
< "+Cnj":0  "@U.mood.cnj@" > TI_CNJ ; !
<     "@D.tense@"  >  TI_IMP ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > TI_FUT_CON ;

LEXICON TICONJi-CONT !!= * @CODE@
< "+Ind":0  "@U.mood.indep@" >  TI_INDi ; !
< "+Cnj":0  "@U.mood.cnj@" > TI_CNJi ; !
<     "@D.tense@"  >  TI_IMPi ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > TI_FUTi_CON ;

LEXICON TICONJâ-CONT !!= * @CODE@
< "+Ind":0  "@U.mood.indep@" >  TI_INDâ ; !
< "+Cnj":0  "@U.mood.cnj@" > TI_CNJâ ; !
<     "@D.tense@"  >  TI_IMPâ ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > TI_FUTâ_CON ;


LEXICON TI_IND !!= @CODE@ First mode, indicative
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":%>          > TI_IND_PRS ; !
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":%>          > TI_IND_PRS ; !
< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":%> > TI_IND_PRS ; !
< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":%> > TI_IND_PRS ; !

LEXICON TI_INDi !!= @CODE@ First mode, indicative
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":%>          > TI_INDi_PRS ; !
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":%>          > TI_INDi_PRS ; !
< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":%> > TI_INDi_PRS ; !
< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":%> > TI_INDi_PRS ; !

LEXICON TI_INDâ !!= @CODE@ First mode, indicative
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":%>          > TI_INDâ_PRS ; !
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":%>          > TI_INDâ_PRS ; !
< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":%> > TI_INDâ_PRS ; !
< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":%> > TI_INDâ_PRS ; !
