src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERBSTEMS !!= @CODE@ here come all the verbstems \\
acoskâcasiw:acoskâcasi TICONJi "s/he works a little at s.t." ; ! VTI-3 Independent, 3s-0’, diminutive
akotâw:akotâ TICONJâ "s/he hangs s.t. up" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
apiscisam:apiscis TICONJ "s/he cuts s.t. into small pieces" ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
apiscisasiw:apiscisasi TICONJi "s/he cuts s.t. into very small pieces" ; ! VTI-3 Independent, 3s-0’, diminutive
âsowahasiw:âsowahasi TICONJi "s/he makes a short crossing, s/he crosses a short distance" ; ! VTI-3 Independent, 3s(-0’), diminutive
astâw:astâ TICONJâ "s/he puts s.t. there, s/he places s.t. there" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
âyimôtam:âyimôt TICONJ "s/he speaks of s.t." ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
cimatâw:cimatâ TICONJâ "s/he places s.t. upright, s/he plants s.t. upright; s/he stands s.t. up, s/he erects s.t." ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
itâpacihtâw:itâpacihtâ TICONJâ "s/he uses s.t. thus, s/he uses such (things)" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
itâpahtam:itâpaht TICONJ "s/he looks at s.t. thus" ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
kaskatwânam:kaskatwân TICONJ "s/he breaks s.t. off by hand" ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
kawatihtâw:kawatihtâ TICONJâ "s/he gets (it/him) chilled, s/he gets s.t. cold" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
kiposkam:kiposk TICONJ "s/he stands over a hole; s/he blocks s.t. from getting out" ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
kitâpayihtâw:kitâpayihtâ TICONJâ "s/he swallows all of s.t." ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
kocispitam:kocispit TICONJ "s/he tastes s.t." ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
kwayaskastâw:kwayaskastâ TICONJâ "s/he places s.t. properly" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
mâham:mâh TICONJ "s/he canoes downriver, s/he paddles downstream, s/he rows downstream, s/he goes downstream (by canoe)" ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s(-0’)
masinihtatâw:masinihtatâ TICONJâ "s/he traces s.t., s/he uses s.t. as a pattern" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
mayâskam:mayâsk TICONJ "s/he passes s.t. walking" ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
mîciw:mîci TICONJi "s/he eats s.t." ; ! VTI-3 Independent, 3s-0’
misîhtâw:misîhtâ TICONJâ "s/he makes s.t. big, larger" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
miyâhtam:miyâht TICONJ "s/he smells s.t., s/he sniffs s.t." ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
môcikihcâsiw:môcikihcâsi TICONJi "s/he has a little fun" ; ! VTI-3 Independent, 3s-0’, diminutive
nahastâw:nahastâ TICONJâ "s/he puts s.t. away; s/he puts s.t. in its place, s/he places s.t. right; s/he stores, caches s.t.; s/he buries s.t." ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
nakinam:nakin TICONJ "s/he stops s.t." ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
nâtwâhtitâw:nâtwâhtitâ TICONJâ "s/he breaks s.t. in two by knocking it on something" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
nêhiyawiyîhkâtam:nêhiyawiyîhkât TICONJ "s/he calls s.t. so in Cree" ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
nitotamâw:nitotamâ TICONJâ "s/he requests s.t., s/he asks for s.t., s/he prays for s.t.; s/he demands things" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
ocipohkasam:ocipohkas TICONJ "s/he shrinks s.t. (with heat)" ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
oscoscocasiw:oscoscocasi TICONJi "s/he coughs a little" ; ! VTI-3 Independent, 3s-0’, diminutive
pâh-pawihtitâw:pâh-pawihtitâ TICONJâ "s/he dusts s.t. by shaking and hitting it on something; s/he shakes s.t. (hit it on something to dust)" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’, reduplicated
pahkwatinam:pahkwatin TICONJ "s/he takes s.t. off by hand, s/he loosens s.t. by hand" ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
paskicipayihtâw:paskicipayihtâ TICONJâ "s/he hangs s.t. over (a rail fence)" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
pâstâmototam:pâstâmotot TICONJ "s/he blasphemes s.t." ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
pîhtâpâwatâw:pîhtâpâwatâ TICONJâ "s/he puts liquid into s.t." ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
pîkisênam:pîkisên TICONJ "s/he has blurred vision" ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
piscipohtâw:piscipohtâ TICONJâ "s/he poisons s.t." ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
pîwêtaham:pîwêtah TICONJ "s/he makes chips (while chopping wood)" ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
sinikohtaham:sinikohtah TICONJ "s/he scrubs s.t." ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
sipwêhtatâw:sipwêhtatâ TICONJâ "s/he takes s.t. away" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
tâskipotâw:tâskipotâ TICONJâ "s/he saws s.t. with a rip saw" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
têpâskiskam:têpâskisk TICONJ "s/he meets s.t. on crossing paths" ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
wîhkistam:wîhkist TICONJ "s/he likes the taste of s.t." ; ! VTI-1 Independent, 3s-0’
yahkisîhtâw:yahkisîhtâ TICONJâ "s/he makes s.t. larger" ; ! VTI-2 Independent, 3s-0’
